Texas, session 892, HB150.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.   Chapter 813.402, Government Code, is amended to read as follows: Sec. 813.402.  CREDIT FOR YEAR IN WHICH ELIGIBLE FOR OFFICE. (a) A member may establish service credit in the elected class for any calendar year during any part of which: (1)  the member held an office included in that class; or (2)  the member was eligible to take the oath for an office included in that class; and (3)  the member did not have any unexcused absences from the member’s chamber of the legislature during any period when that chamber lacked a quorum to conduct business. (b)   A member may establish credit under this section by depositing with the retirement system in a lump sum a contribution computed as provided by Section 813.404, plus interest computed at an annual rate of 10 percent from the fiscal year in which the service was performed to the date of deposit. SECTION 5.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.